Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.033

Funding staff support for commodity boards and commissions—Rules.

(1) The director may provide by rule for a method to fund staff support for all commodity boards and commissions if a position is not directly funded by the legislature.

(2) Staff support funded under this section, RCW 15.65.047(1)(c), 15.66.055(3), 15.24.215, 15.26.265, 15.28.320, 15.44.190, 15.88.180, 15.89.150, and 16.67.190, and chapter 15.115 RCW shall be limited to one-half full-time equivalent employee for all commodity boards and commissions.

[ 2009 c 33 s 38; 2006 c 330 s 27; 2002 c 313 s 78.]

NOTES:

Construction—2006 c 330: See RCW 15.89.900.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.